Colorado statutes. TITLE 26.5 Early Childhood Programs and Services
PART 7
EARLY CHILDHOOD MENTAL HEALTH
CONSULTATION PROGRAM

26.5-3-701. Definitions.

As used in this part 7, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Mental health consultant" means an early childhood mental health consultant who is funded by appropriations allocated or awarded to the department for the program and who meets the qualifications outlined in the program designed and developed pursuant to this part 7.

"Program" means the statewide voluntary program of early childhood mental health consultation designed, implemented, and operated by the department pursuant to this part 7.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 639, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-6.5-401 as it existed prior to 2022.

26.5-3-702. Early childhood mental health consultation - statewide program - creation - purpose - rules.

On or before July 1, 2022, the department shall design, implement, and operate the statewide voluntary program of early childhood mental health consultation to expand and enhance current practices across the state. The department, through the program, shall support mental health in a variety of settings, including but not limited to early child care and learning, elementary schools, home visitation, child welfare, public health, and health care, including settings providing prenatal and postpartum care.

In designing and developing the program, the department shall work in consultation with the national center of excellence for infant and early childhood mental health consultation funded by the United States department of health and human services; nationally recognized entities that support implementation of sustainable systems or programs that focus on promoting the social, emotional, and behavioral outcomes of young children; and key stakeholders in the state, including mental health professionals, nonprofit organizations with expertise in mental health, organizations representing parents of children who would benefit from early childhood mental health consultation, hospitals and other health-care provider organizations with expertise working with children facing behavioral health and other challenges to optimal growth and development, early child care and education providers, and clinicians with expertise in infant and early childhood mental health.

The department shall coordinate with community-based organizations to ensure the effective implementation of the program and model of consultation established pursuant to section 26.5-3-703, as well as support the availability of resources across the state to support the program and the mental health consultants in the program in their work.

The executive director may promulgate rules for the design, implementation, and operation of the program.

The purpose of the program is to:

Increase the number of qualified and appropriately trained mental health consultants throughout the state who will consult with professionals working with children across a diversity of settings, as well as other adults, including family members, who directly interact with and care for children;

Support and provide guidance and training, through visits with mental health consultants in the program, to families, expecting families, caregivers, and providers across a diversity of settings in addressing the healthy social-emotional developmental needs of children and families during the prenatal period through eight years of age;

Develop a defined model of consultation that is rooted in diversity, equity, and inclusion for the state pursuant to section 26.5-3-703 that includes qualifications and competencies for mental health consultants, job expectations, expected outcomes, and guidance on ratios between mental health consultants in the program and the settings they support; and

Develop and maintain a statewide professional development plan pursuant to section 26.5-3-704 that assists the mental health consultants in meeting the expectations and developing the competencies set forth in the model of consultation established pursuant to section 26.5-3-703.

Nothing in this part 7 creates or expands the regulatory authority of the department over mental health professionals who are not funded by appropriations made to the department for the program pursuant to this part 7.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 639, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-6.5-402 as it existed prior to 2022.

26.5-3-703. Model of early childhood mental health consultation - standards and guidelines - qualifications.

On or before July 1, 2022, the department shall design and develop, in consultation with the stakeholders listed in section 26.5-3-702 (1)(b), a model of consultation for the program that includes qualifications for mental health consultants, job expectations, expected outcomes, and guidance on ratios between mental health consultants and the settings they support, referred to in this section as "the model". The model must include standards and guidelines to ensure the program is implemented effectively, with primary consideration given to evidence-based services. The standards and guidelines must include:

Clear qualifications for mental health consultants in the program, including, at a minimum, expertise in adult and child mental health theory, practice, and services; early childhood, child development, and family systems; knowledge of, and skills to address, circumstances that affect children's behavior and mental health; knowledge of developmental science and milestones; knowledge of a consultative model of practice; and available resources and services to children and families to alleviate family stress;

Expectations for the placement of regional consultants that will most effectively meet local community need for mental health consultants in the program. The department shall periodically conduct an open and competitive selection process for the placement of any publicly funded mental health consultants in the program.

Guidance concerning the scope of work that mental health consultants in the program may provide to professionals working with young children and families, including guidance on appropriate referrals, training, coaching, prevention, and any other appropriate services;

Methods to increase the availability of bilingual or multilingual mental health consultants in the program and otherwise ensure the cultural competency of mental health consultants in the program and ensure that the consultant population reflects an array of characteristics and backgrounds and is reflective of the diversity of the providers, children, and families being served;

Guidance on the diverse settings in which and types of providers with whom mental health consultants in the program may work to meet the varied needs of children and families from prenatal through eight years of age. The model must include provisions that ensure that mental health consultants in the program may work with a diversity of professionals and caregivers, including but not limited to early child care and education teachers and providers, elementary school teachers and administrators, home visitors, child welfare caseworkers, public health professionals, and health-care professionals, including settings providing prenatal and postpartum care.

Anticipated outcomes that the program and mental health consultants in the program should achieve, including:

Promoting social-emotional growth and development of children;

Providing guidance to professionals and caregivers to effectively understand and support children's positive behavior and development;

Understanding the effects of trauma and adversity, including oppression, prejudice, discrimination, racism, and gender inequity, on the developing brain to ultimately reduce challenging behaviors and increase positive early experiences;

Promoting high-quality interactions and relationships between children and adults;

Supporting the mental health and well-being of adults who care for children;

Connecting and referring children, families, and providers to programs, resources, and supports that will assist them in their development and success while addressing barriers to accessing such resources and supports;

Supporting equitable, inclusive outcomes for the diverse providers, children, and families throughout the state; and

Guidance on appropriate ratios of mental health consultants and the settings they support, as well as caseload expectations.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 640, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-6.5-403 as it existed prior to 2022.

26.5-3-704. Statewide professional development plan for early childhood mental health consultants.

On or before July 1, 2022, the department shall develop a statewide professional development plan to support mental health consultants in the program in meeting the expectations set forth in the model of consultation described in section 26.5-3-703, referred to in this section as "the plan". In developing the plan, the department shall work collaboratively, to the extent practicable, with the national center of excellence for infant and early childhood mental health consultation funded by the United States department of health and human services. The department may implement the plan in partnership with nonprofits, institutions of higher education, and credentialing programs focused on infant and early childhood mental health.

The plan must include, at a minimum, training related to:

Trauma and trauma-informed practices and interventions;

Adverse childhood experiences;

The science of resilience and interventions to promote resilience;

Child development through eight years of age;

Caregiver substance use and effective family interventions;

Impact of inequity and bias on children, families, caregivers, mental health consultants, and providers, and strategies to mitigate such impact;

Sensory processing issues;

The needs of children with developmental delays and disabilities, including children born prematurely or with special health-care needs, and special education law;

Colorado's child protection and foster care system;

Occupational therapy, speech therapy, physical therapy, and mental health therapy;

Other public and private supports and services;

Early childhood social-emotional development and family systems;

Early childhood mental health diagnosis and effective treatment models; and

Consultation as a model of adult learning.

The plan must also:

Allow mental health consultants in the program to access regionally appropriate and culturally responsive programs to best link them to the children and families in their communities and their unique needs;

Include strategies for mental health consultants in the program to establish individualized coaching as requested by teachers, caregivers, and families; and

Provide opportunities for regular support meetings between mental health consultants in the program; supervisors, including reflective supervisors; and peer mental health consultants. The support meetings must include reflections on the practice impact of attitudes and values.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 642, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-6.5-404 as it existed prior to 2022.

26.5-3-705. Statewide qualifications and competencies for early childhood mental health consultants.

The department shall ensure that each mental health consultant funded through the program meets the qualifications and competencies outlined in the program as designed and developed pursuant to this part 7.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 643, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-6.5-405 as it existed prior to 2022.

26.5-3-706. Data collection - reporting.

On or before July 1, 2023, the department shall develop a statewide data collection and information system to analyze implementation data and selected outcomes to identify areas for improvement, promote accountability, and provide insights to continually improve child and program outcomes. The data collection and information system, and any related processes, must place the least burden possible on the mental health consultants in the program. In selecting the implementation data and outcomes, the department shall incorporate the variability across diverse settings and populations.

Notwithstanding section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), the department shall, beginning in 2023 and continuing every two years thereafter, in its presentation to the joint budget committee of the general assembly, as well as its presentation to its committee of reference at the hearing held pursuant to section 2-7-203 (2)(a) of the "State Measurement for Accountable, Responsive, and Transparent (SMART) Government Act" in January 2027, report on the following issues:

A gap analysis of the available number of mental health consultants and the unmet need in the type of settings in which mental health consultants practice in accordance with the program; and

Identified adjustments to better meet mental health consultant caseload, with the department identifying a target number of needed consultants in the program.

On or before August 1, 2026, the department shall contract with an independent third party to conduct an evaluation, using standard evaluation measures, of the program and its impact on early childhood and program outcomes across the state. The department shall present the results of the evaluation as part of its presentation to its committee of reference at the hearing held pursuant to section 2-7-203 (2)(a) of the "State Measurement for Accountable, Responsive, and Transparent (SMART) Government Act" in January 2027.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 643, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-6.5-406 as it existed prior to 2022.

26.5-3-707. Funding support.

The department and the department of health care policy and financing shall explore funding options for the program and improving access to mental health consultants, including access to various funding sources, as well as the children's basic health plan, article 8 of title 25.5, and the state medical assistance program, articles 4 to 6 of title 25.5. On or before January 1, 2023, the departments shall report on any identified funding options to the joint budget committee of the general assembly as necessary thereafter, in accordance with section 24-1-136.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 643, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-6.5-407 as it existed prior to 2022.